Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-236
Program; implementation.

Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, the enrollment option program shall be implemented by all public school districts.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 207, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 65;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3405;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 40.